test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-viietshwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vīetšõz: # Noun 184 'eng /est hundipaju/fin' - full paradigm
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Nom: vīetšõz
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Gen: vīetšõ
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Par: vīetšõzt
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Dat: vīetšõn
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Ins: vīetšõks
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Ill: [vīetšõ, vīetšõz]
     vīetšõz+N+Sg+Ela: vīetšõst
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Nom: vīetšõd
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Gen: vīetšõd
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Par: vīetšidi
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Dat: vīetšõdõn
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Ins: vīetšõdõks
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Ill: vīetšiz
     vīetšõz+N+Pl+Ela: vīetšist
